Vermont, session 2025-2026, S273.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Elementary and High School Designation * * *
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 820 is added to read:
§ 820. SCHOOLS ELIGIBLE FOR DESIGNATION
Under this chapter, a school district that does not maintain a school for the
grades for which it is organized to provide education shall designate up to three
schools to serve as the public school or schools of the district. A school
eligible for designation shall be:
(1) a public school in Vermont;
(2) a public school located outside Vermont in a different state; or
(3) an independent school recognized under section 166 of this title that
meets at least three of the following four criteria:
(A) The recognized independent school serves as a regional CTE
center as defined in section 1522 of this title.
(B) The recognized independent school was established through the
granting of a charter by the Vermont General Assembly.
(C) The recognized independent school qualified as a public school
under the definition of “public school” in effect on June 30, 1991, under
subdivision 11(a)(7) of this title.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 3 of 84
(D) The recognized independent school is designated under section
1935 of this title as an employer of teachers within the meaning of chapter 55
of this title (State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont).
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 821 is amended to read:
§ 821. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC ELEMENTARY
SCHOOLS OR PAY TUITION TO DESIGNATED SCHOOLS
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved schools within
the district in which elementary education for its resident students in
kindergarten through grade six is provided unless:
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to provide for the
elementary education of the students by paying tuition in accordance with law
to one or more public three or fewer elementary schools in one or more school
districts that qualify for designation under section 820 of this title;
(2) the school district is organized to provide only high school education
for its students; or
(3) the General Assembly provides otherwise.
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, without previous
authorization by the electorate, a school board in a district that operates an
elementary school may pay tuition for elementary students who reside near a
public elementary school in an adjacent district upon request of the student’s
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 4 of 84
parent or guardian, if in the board’s judgment the student’s education can be
more conveniently furnished there due to geographic considerations. Within
30 days of following the board’s decision, a parent or guardian who is
dissatisfied with the decision of the board under this subsection may request a
determination by the Secretary, who shall have authority to direct the school
board to pay all, some, or none of the student’s tuition and whose decision
shall be final.
(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the electorate of a
school district that does not maintain an elementary school may grant general
authority to the school board to pay tuition for an elementary student at an
approved independent elementary school or an independent school meeting
education quality standards pursuant to sections 823 and 828 of this chapter
upon notice given by the student’s parent or legal guardian before April 15 for
the next academic year. [Repealed.]
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 822 is amended to read:
§ 822. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS OR
PAY TUITION TO DESIGNATED SCHOOLS
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved high schools
in which high school education is provided for its resident students unless:
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to close an existing high
school and to provide for the high school education of its students by paying
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 5 of 84
tuition to a public three or fewer high school, an approved independent high
school, or an independent school meeting education quality standards, to be
selected by the parents or guardians of the student, within or outside the State
schools that qualify for designation under section 820 of this title; or
(2) the school district is organized to provide only elementary education
for its students.
(b) For purposes of this section, a school district that is organized to
provide kindergarten through grade 12 and maintains a program of education
for only the first eight years of compulsory school attendance shall be
obligated to pay tuition for its resident students for at least four additional
years.
(c)(1) A school district may both maintain a high school and furnish high
school education by paying tuition:
(A) to To a public school other than the designated school or schools
as in the judgment of the school board may best serve the interests of the
students; or. Judgment of the board shall be final in regard to the institution
the students may attend at public cost.
(B) to an approved independent school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards if the school board judges that a student
has unique educational needs that cannot be served within the district or at a
nearby public school. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 6 of 84
(2) The judgment of the board shall be final in regard to the institution
the students may attend at public cost. [Repealed.]
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 823 is amended to read:
§ 823. ELEMENTARY TUITION
(a) Tuition for elementary students shall be paid by the district in which the
student is a resident. The district shall pay the full tuition charged its students
attending a public designated elementary school. If a payment made to a
public designated elementary school is three percent more or less than the
calculated net cost per elementary pupil in the receiving school district for the
year of attendance, the district shall be reimbursed, credited, or refunded
pursuant to section 836 of this title. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subsection or of subsection 825(b) of this title, the boards or boards of trustees
of both the receiving and sending districts or schools may enter into tuition
agreements with terms differing from the provisions of those subsections,
provided that the receiving district or school must offer identical terms to all
sending districts, and further provided that the statutory provisions apply to
any sending district that declines the offered terms.
(b) Unless the electorate of a school district authorizes payment of a higher
amount at an annual or special meeting warned for the purpose, the tuition paid
to an approved independent elementary school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards shall not exceed the least of:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 7 of 84
(1) the average announced tuition of Vermont union elementary schools
for the year of attendance;
(2) the tuition charged by the approved independent school for the year
of attendance; or
(3) the average per-pupil tuition the district pays for its other resident
elementary students in the year in which the student is enrolled in the approved
independent school. [Repealed.]
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 824 is amended to read:
§ 824. HIGH SCHOOL TUITION
(a) Tuition for high school students shall be paid by the school district in
which the student is a resident.
(b) Except as otherwise provided for technical students in chapter 37 of this
title, the district shall pay the full tuition charged its students attending a public
designated high school in Vermont or an adjoining state or a public or
approved independent school in Vermont functioning as an approved area
career technical center, or an independent school meeting education quality
standards;, provided:
(1) If a payment made to a public designated high school or an
independent school meeting education quality standards is three percent more
or less than the calculated net cost per secondary pupil in the receiving school
district or independent school for the year of attendance, then the district or
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 8 of 84
school shall be reimbursed, credited, or refunded pursuant to section 836 of
this title.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection or of subsection
825(b) of this title, the board or board of trustees of the receiving public
designated school district, public or approved independent school functioning
as an area career technical center, or independent school meeting education
quality standards may enter into tuition agreements with the boards of sending
districts that have terms differing from the provisions of those subsections,
provided that the receiving district or school must offer identical terms to all
sending districts, and further provided that the statutory provisions apply to
any sending district that declines the offered terms.
(c) The district shall pay an amount not to exceed the average announced
tuition of Vermont union high schools for the year of attendance for its
students enrolled in an approved independent school not functioning as a
Vermont area career technical center, or any higher amount approved by the
electorate at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose. [Repealed.]
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 826 is amended to read:
§ 826. NOTICE OF TUITION RATES; SPECIAL EDUCATION CHARGES
(a) A school board, or the board of trustees of an independent school
meeting education quality standards, a school eligible for designation under
subdivision 820(3) of this title that proposes to increase tuition charges shall
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 9 of 84
notify the school board of the school district from which its nonresident
students come, and the Secretary, of the proposed increase on or before
January 15 in any year; such increases shall not become effective without the
notice and not until the following school year.
(b) A school board or the board of trustees of an independent school
meeting education quality standards may establish a separate tuition for one or
more special education programs. No such tuition shall be established unless
the State Board has by rule defined the program as of a type that may be
funded by a separate tuition. Any such tuition shall be announced in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. The amount
of tuition shall reflect the net cost per pupil in the program. The announcement
of tuition shall describe the special education services included or excluded
from coverage. Tuition for part-time students shall be reduced proportionally.
(c) Excess special education costs incurred by a supervisory union in
providing special education services to a student beyond those covered by
tuition may be charged to the student’s supervisory union for the district of
residence. However, only actual costs or actual proportionate costs attributable
to the student may be charged.
(d) The State Board shall adopt rules relating to the types of special
education programs that may establish tuition charges and relating to methods
and times of calculating excess charges.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 10 of 84
Sec. 7. 16 V.S.A. § 827 is amended to read:
§ 827. DESIGNATION OF A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL OR AN
APPROVED INDEPENDENT HIGH SCHOOL AS THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT
(a) School designation.
(1) High school designation. A The school board of a school district not
maintaining an approved public high school may shall vote on such terms or
conditions as it deems appropriate, to designate three or fewer approved
independent or public high schools eligible for designation under section 820
of this title as the public high school or schools of the district. The vote of the
school board shall occur at a school board meeting, held in accordance with the
Vermont Open Meeting Law.
(2) Elementary school designation. The school board of a school district
not maintaining an approved public elementary school shall vote on such terms
or conditions as it deems appropriate, to designate three or fewer schools
eligible for designation under section 820 of this title as the public elementary
school or schools of the district. The vote of the school board shall occur at a
school board meeting, held in accordance with the Vermont Open Meeting
Law.
(b) Tuition. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the board of
trustees or the school board of a designated school votes to accept this
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 11 of 84
designation, the school shall be regarded as a public school for tuition purposes
under subsection 824(b) sections 823 and 824 of this title, and the sending
school district shall pay tuition only to that school, and to any other school
designated under this section, until such time as the sending school district or
the designated school votes to rescind the designation.
(c) Parent requests. A parent or legal guardian who is dissatisfied with the
instruction provided at a designated school or who cannot obtain for his or her
the parent’s or legal guardian’s child the kind of course or instruction desired
there, or whose child can be better accommodated in an approved independent
or a public elementary or public high school nearer his or her the child’s home
during the next academic year, may request on or before April 15 that the
school board pay tuition to another approved independent or public elementary
or public high school selected by the parent or guardian.
(d) School board decision regarding parent requests. The school board may
pay tuition to another approved public elementary or public high school as
requested by the parent or legal guardian if in its judgment that will best serve
the interests of the student. Its decision shall be final in regard to the
institution the student may attend. If the board approves the parent’s request,
the board shall pay tuition for the student in an amount not to exceed the least
of:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 12 of 84
(1) The statewide average announced tuition of Vermont union high
schools.
(2) The per-pupil tuition the district pays to the designated school in the
year in which the student is enrolled in the nondesignated school. If the district
has designated more than one school pursuant to this section, then it shall be
the lowest per-pupil tuition paid to a designated school.
(3) The tuition charged by the approved nondesignated school in the
year in which the student is enrolled.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary:
(1) the school districts of Pawlet, Rupert, and Wells may designate a
public high school located in New York as the public high school of the district
pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) unless otherwise directed by an affirmative vote of the school
district, when the Wells Board approves parental requests to pay tuition to a
nondesignated approved independent or public school, the Board shall pay
tuition in an amount not to exceed the base education amount as determined
under section 4011 of this title for the fiscal year in which tuition is being paid;
and
(3) unless otherwise directed by an affirmative vote of the school
district, when the Strafford Board approves a parental request to pay tuition to
a nondesignated approved independent or public school, the Board shall pay
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 13 of 84
tuition to the nondesignated school pursuant to section 824 of this title for the
year in which the student is enrolled; provided, however, that it shall not pay
tuition in an amount that exceeds the tuition paid to the designated school for
the same academic year. [Repealed.]
Sec. 8. 16 V.S.A. § 828 is amended to read:
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
(a) A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to:
(1) a public school located in Vermont;
(2) an approved independent school that:
(A) is located in Vermont;
(B) is approved under section 166 of this title on or before July 1,
2025;
(C) is located within either:
(i) a supervisory district that does not operate a public school for
some or all grades as of July 1, 2024; or
(ii) a supervisory union with one or more member school districts
that does not operate a public school for some or all grades as of July 1, 2024;
(D) had at least 25 percent of its student enrollment composed of
students attending on a district-funded tuition basis pursuant to chapter 21 of
this title during the 2023–2024 school year; and
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 14 of 84
(E) complies with the minimum class size requirements contained in
subdivision 165(a)(9) of this title and State Board rule; provided, however, that
if a school is unable to comply with the class size minimum standards due to
geographic isolation or a school has developed an implementation plan to meet
the class size minimum requirements, the school may ask the State Board to
grant it a waiver from this subdivision (E), which decision shall be final a
school eligible for designation under section 820 of this title;
(3) an independent school meeting education quality standards;
[Repealed.]
(4) a tutorial program approved by the State Board;
(5) an approved education program;
(6) a public school located in another state; or
(7) a therapeutic approved independent school located in Vermont or
another state or country that is approved under the laws of that state or country.
(b) Payment of tuition on behalf of a person shall not be denied on account
of age.
(c) Unless otherwise provided, a person who is aggrieved by a decision of a
school board relating to eligibility for tuition payments, the amount of tuition
payable, or the school the person may attend, may appeal to the State Board
and its decision shall be final.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 15 of 84
(d) As used in this section, “therapeutic approved independent school”
means an approved independent school that limits enrollment for publicly
funded students residing in Vermont to students who are on an individualized
education program or plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, or who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement
between a local education agency and the school or pursuant to a court order.
[Repealed.]
Sec. 9. REPEAL
16 V.S.A. § 835 (tuitioning of elementary students in Lemington,
Bloomfield, Brunswick, Granby, Guildhall, and Maidstone) is repealed.
Sec. 10. 16 V.S.A. § 836 is amended to read:
§ 836. TUITION OVERCHARGE OR UNDERCHARGE
(a) Annually, on or before November 1, the Secretary shall inform each
school board or board of trustees of a receiving public designated school, each
board of trustees of a receiving approved independent school for which the
Secretary has calculated a net cost per pupil, and each sending school district
in Vermont of the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil in the
receiving schools. Each school board or board of trustees of a receiving school
shall then determine whether it overcharged or undercharged any sending
district for tuition charges and shall notify the district by December 15 of the
same year of the amount due or the amount to be refunded or credited.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 16 of 84
(b) If the sending district has paid tuition charges in excess of three percent
of the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil and is not sending
enough students to the receiving district to use the overcharge funds as credit
against tuition, the receiving district shall refund the overcharge money by on
or before July 31; provided, however, that the refund shall be in the amount
that exceeded a three-percent three percent overcharge. Interest owed the
sending district on overcharge monies shall begin to accrue on December 1, at
the rate of one-half percent per month.
(c) If the receiving district has undercharged tuition in an amount three
percent or more than the calculated net cost per elementary or secondary pupil,
the sending district shall pay the receiving district an amount equal to the
amount of the undercharge that is between three percent and ten percent of the
net cost per pupil. If payment is not made by on or before July 31 of the year
following the year in which the undercharge was determined, interest owed the
receiving district on undercharge monies shall begin to accrue on August 1, at
the rate of one percent per month.
* * * Recognized Independent Schools * * *
Sec. 11. 16 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. CLASSIFICATIONS AND DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this title, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 17 of 84
(8) “Independent school” means a school other than a public school,
which provides a program of elementary or secondary education, or both. An
“independent school meeting education quality standards” means an
independent school in Vermont that undergoes the education quality standards
process and meets the requirements of subsection 165(b) of this title.
* * *
(19) “Recognized independent school” for any school year means an
independent school that meets the requirements for recognized independent
schools in section 166 of this title and that is not a home study program.
(20) “Approved independent school” means an independent school that
is approved under section 166 of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
(36) “Therapeutic school” means a recognized independent school that
limits enrollment to students who are on an individualized education program
(IEP) or plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.
§ 794 and who are enrolled pursuant to a written contract between a local
education agency (LEA) and the school.
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 18 of 84
Sec. 12. 16 V.S.A. § 165 is amended to read:
§ 165. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS; EQUAL EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES; INDEPENDENT SCHOOL MEETING
EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS
* * *
(b) Annually, the Secretary shall determine whether students in each
Vermont public school are provided educational opportunities substantially
equal to those provided in other public schools. If the Secretary determines
that a school is not meeting the education quality standards listed in subsection
(a) of this section or that the school is making insufficient progress in
improving student performance in relation to the standards for student
performance set forth in subdivision 164(9) of this title, the Secretary shall
describe in writing actions that a district must take in order to meet either or
both sets of standards and shall provide technical assistance to the school. If
the school fails to meet the standards or make sufficient progress within two
years following the determination, the Secretary shall recommend to the State
Board one or more of the following actions:
(1) the Agency continue to provide technical assistance for one more
cycle of review;
(2) the State Board adjust supervisory union boundaries or
responsibilities of the superintendency pursuant to section 261 of this title;
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 19 of 84
(3) the Secretary assume administrative control of an individual school,
school district, or supervisory union, including budgetary control to ensure
sound financial practices, only to the extent necessary to correct deficiencies;
(4) the State Board close an individual school or schools and require that
the school district pay tuition to another public school or an approved
independent school eligible for designation pursuant to chapter 21 of this title;
or
* * *
(f) In order to be designated an a recognized independent school meeting
education quality standards, an a recognized independent school shall
participate in the education quality standards process of subsection (b) of this
section. An A recognized independent school shall receive technical assistance
in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b), but shall not be subject to
subdivisions (b)(2)–(4) of this section. The school shall be an a recognized
independent school meeting education quality standards unless the State
Board, after opportunity for hearing, finds that:
* * *
Sec. 13. 16 V.S.A. § 166 is amended to read:
§ 166. APPROVED AND RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 20 of 84
(a) Authority. An independent school may operate and provide elementary
education or secondary education if it is either approved or recognized as set
forth in this section.
(b) Approved independent schools. On application, the State Board shall
approve an independent school that offers elementary or secondary education
if it finds, after opportunity for hearing, that the school provides a minimum
course of study pursuant to section 906 of this title and that it substantially
complies with all statutory requirements for approved independent schools and
the Board’s rules for approved independent schools. An independent school
that intends to accept public tuition shall be approved by the State Board only
on the condition that the school agrees, notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, to enroll any student who requires special education services
and who is placed in or referred to the approved independent school as an
appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the
student’s individualized education program team or by the local education
agency; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an
independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an
individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to
a written agreement between the local education agency and the school. Except
as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, the Board’s rules must at
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 21 of 84
minimum require that the school have the resources required to meet its stated
objectives, including financial capacity, faculty who are qualified by training
and experience in the areas in which they are assigned, and physical facilities
and special services that are in accordance with any State or federal law or
regulation. Approval may be granted without State Board evaluation in the
case of any school accredited by a private, State, or regional agency recognized
by the State Board for accrediting purposes, provided that the State Board shall
determine that the school complies with all student enrollment provisions
required by law.
(1) On application, the State Board shall approve an independent school
that offers kindergarten but no other graded education if it finds, after
opportunity for hearing, that the school substantially complies with the Board’s
rules for approved independent kindergartens. The State Board may delegate to
another State agency the authority to evaluate the safety and adequacy of the
buildings in which kindergartens are conducted but shall consider all findings
and recommendations of any such agency in making its approval decision.
(2) Approvals under this subsection (b) shall be for a term established by
rule of the Board but not greater than five years.
(3) An approved independent school shall provide to the parent or
guardian responsible for each of its students, prior to accepting any money for
a student, an accurate statement in writing of its status under this section and a
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 22 of 84
copy of this section. Failure to comply with this provision may create a
permissible inference of false advertising in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2005.
(4) Each approved independent school shall provide to the Secretary on
October 1 of each year the names, genders, dates of birth, and addresses of its
enrolled students. Within seven days of the termination of a student’s
enrollment, the approved independent school shall notify the Secretary of the
name and address of the student. The Secretary shall notify the appropriate
school officials as provided in section 1126 of this title.
(5) The State Board may revoke, suspend, or impose conditions upon the
approval of an approved independent school, after having provided an
opportunity for a hearing, for substantial failure to comply with the minimum
course of study, for failure to demonstrate that the school has the resources
required to meet its stated objectives, for failure to comply with statutory
requirements or the Board’s rules for approved independent schools, or for
failure to report under subdivision (4) of this subsection (b). Upon that
revocation or suspension, students required to attend school who are enrolled
in that school shall become truant unless they enroll in a public school, an
approved or recognized independent school, or a home study program.
(6) This subdivision applies to an independent school located in Vermont
that offers a distance learning program and that, because of its structure, does
not meet some or all the rules of the State Board for approved independent
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 23 of 84
schools. In order to be approved under this subdivision, a school shall meet the
standards adopted by rule of the State Board for approved independent schools
that can be applied to the applicant school and any other standards or rules
adopted by the State Board regarding these types of schools. A school
approved under this subdivision shall not be eligible to receive tuition
payments from public school districts under chapter 21 of this title.
(7) Approval for independent residential schools under this subsection is
also contingent upon proof of the school’s satisfactory completion of an annual
fire safety inspection by the Department of Public Safety or its designee
pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 173, subchapter 2. A certificate executed by the
inspecting entity, declaring satisfactory completion of the inspection and
identifying the date by which a new inspection must occur, shall be posted at
the school in a public location. The school shall provide a copy of the
certificate to the Secretary of Education after each annual inspection. The
school shall pay the actual cost of the inspection unless waived or reduced by
the inspecting entity.
(8)(A) If an approved independent school experiences any of the
following financial reporting events during the period of its approved status,
the school shall notify the Secretary of Education within five days after its
knowledge of the event unless the failure is de minimis:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 24 of 84
(i) the school’s failure to file its federal or State tax returns when
due, after permissible extension periods have been taken into account;
(ii) the school’s failure to meet its payroll obligations as they are
due or to pay federal or State payroll tax obligations as they are due;
(iii) the school’s failure to maintain required retirement
contributions;
(iv) the school’s use of designated funds for nondesignated
purposes;
(v) the school’s inability to fully comply with the financial terms
of its secured installment debt obligations over a period of two consecutive
months, including the school’s failure to make interest or principal payments
as they are due or to maintain any required financial ratios;
(vi) the withdrawal or conditioning of the school’s accreditation on
financial grounds by a private, State, or regional agency recognized by the
State Board for accrediting purposes; or
(vii) the school’s insolvency, as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 2286(a).
(B)(i) If the Secretary reasonably believes that an approved
independent school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during
the period of its approved status, then the Secretary shall notify the school in
writing of the reasons for this belief and permit the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 25 of 84
(ii) If the Secretary, after having provided the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond, does not find that the school has satisfactorily
responded or demonstrated its financial capacity, the Secretary may establish a
review team that, with the consent of the school, includes a member of the
Council of Independent Schools, to:
(I) conduct a school visit to assess the school’s financial
capacity;
(II) obtain from the school such financial documentation as the
review team requires to perform its assessment; and
(III) submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
State Board.
(iii) If the State Board concludes that an approved independent
school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of
its approved status, the State Board may take any action that is authorized by
this section.
(iv) In considering whether an independent school lacks financial
capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of its approved status
and what actions the State Board should take if it makes this finding, the State
Board may consult with, and draw on the analytical resources of, the Vermont
Department of Financial Regulation.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 26 of 84
(C) Information provided by an independent school under this
subsection that is not already in the public domain is exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential. [Repealed.]
(c) Recognized independent schools. Upon filing an enrollment notice, a
recognized independent school may provide elementary or secondary
education in Vermont. The enrollment notice shall be on a form provided by
the Secretary and shall be filed with the Secretary no not earlier than three
months before the beginning of the school year for the public schools in the
town in which the applicant proposes to locate.
(1) The enrollment notice shall contain the following information and
assurances:
(A) a statement that the school will be in session an amount of time
substantially equivalent to that required for public schools;
(B) a detailed description or outline of the minimum course of study
for each grade level the school offers and how the annual assessment of each
student will be performed; and
(C) assurances that:
(i) the school will prepare and maintain attendance records for
each student enrolled or regularly attending classes;
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 27 of 84
(ii) at least once each year, the school will assess each student’s
progress, and will maintain records of that assessment, and present the result of
that assessment to each student’s parent or guardian;
(iii) the school’s educational program will include the minimum
course of study set forth in section 906 of this title;
(iv) the school will have teachers and materials sufficient to carry
out the school’s educational program; and
(v) the school will meet such State and federal laws and
regulations concerning its physical facilities and health and safety matters as
are applicable to recognized independent schools.
(2) If the Secretary has information that creates significant doubt about
whether the school would be able to meet the requirements set forth in this
subsection, the Secretary may call a hearing. At the hearing, the school shall
establish that it can meet the requirements for recognized independent schools.
Failure to do so shall result in a finding by the Secretary that the school must
take specified action to come into compliance within a specified time frame or
the children enrolled must attend another recognized independent school, a
public school, an approved independent school, or a home study program, or
be declared truant unless absent with legal excuse.
(3) A recognized independent school shall provide to each student’s
parent or guardian a copy of its currently filed statement of objectives and a
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 28 of 84
copy of this section. The copy shall be provided when the student enrolls or
before September 1, whichever comes later. Failure to comply with this
subsection may create a permissible inference of false advertising in violation
of 13 V.S.A. § 2005.
(4) A recognized independent school shall renew its enrollment notice
annually. An independent school shall be recognized for a period not to
exceed five years by the Secretary without need for filing an annual enrollment
notice if:
(A) it is recognized by an organization approved by the State Board
for the purpose of recognizing such school; or
(B) it is accredited by a private, state, or regional agency approved by
the State Board for accrediting purposes; provided, however, nothing in this
subdivision (4) shall be construed to prohibit the Secretary from initiating a
hearing under this subsection (c).
(5) If the Secretary has information that creates significant doubt about
whether the school, once in operation, is meeting the requirements for
recognized independent schools, the Secretary may call a hearing. At the
hearing, the school shall establish that it has met the requirements for
recognized independent schools. Failure to do so shall result in a finding by
the Secretary that:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 29 of 84
(A) the school may not be in operation for the remainder of the
school year and that the children are truant unless absent with legal excuse or
enrolled in a public school, an independent school, another recognized
independent school, or a home study program; or
(B) the school must take specified action to come into compliance
within a specified time frame or the school will not be permitted to operate for
the remainder of the school year.
(6) Each recognized independent school shall provide to the Secretary
on October 1 of each year the names, genders, dates of birth, and addresses of
its enrolled students. Within seven days of following the termination of a
student’s enrollment, the recognized independent school shall notify the
Secretary of the name and address of the student. The Secretary shall notify
the appropriate school officials as provided in section 1126 of this title.
(7) After the filing of the enrollment notice or at a hearing, if the school
is unable to comply with any specific requirements due to deep religious
conviction shared by an organized group, the Secretary may waive such
requirements if he or she the Secretary determines that the educational
purposes of this subsection are being or will be substantially met.
(d) Council of Independent Schools. A Council of Independent Schools is
created consisting of 11 members, no fewer than three of whom shall be
representatives of recognized independent schools. The Secretary shall
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 30 of 84
appoint nine members from within the independent schools’ community. The
Secretary shall appoint two members from the public-at-large. Each member
shall serve for two years and may be reappointed for up to an additional two
terms. The Council shall adopt rules for its own operation. A chair shall be
elected by and from among the members. The duties of the Council shall
include advising the Secretary on policies and procedures with respect to
independent schools. No hearing shall be initiated under this section before the
State Board or by the Secretary until the recommendations of the Council have
been sought and received. The recommendations of the Council, including any
minority reports, shall be admissible at the hearing.
(e) Harassment, hazing, and bullying policies. The board of trustees of an
approved or a recognized independent school operating in Vermont shall adopt
harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies; establish procedures for
dealing with harassment, hazing, and bullying of students; and provide notice
of these. The provisions of chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title for public
schools shall apply to this subsection, except that the board shall follow its
own procedures for adopting policy.
(f) Tuition bills. An approved independent A school eligible for
designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title that accepts students for
whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter 21 of this title shall
bill the sending district monthly for a State-placed student and shall not bill the
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 31 of 84
sending district for any month in which the State-placed student was not
enrolled.
(g) Tuition students; assessments. An approved independent A school
eligible for designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title that accepts
students for whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter 21 of this
title shall use the assessment or assessments required under subdivision 164(9)
of this title to measure attainment of standards for student performance of
those students. In addition, the school shall provide data related to the
assessment or assessments as required by the Secretary.
* * * Conforming Changes to Title 16 * * *
Sec. 14. 16 V.S.A. § 253 is amended to read:
§ 253. CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORDS
* * *
(c) In accordance with 21 V.S.A. § 306, a board member, superintendent,
or headmaster shall not enter into on behalf of a supervisory union, school
district, or recognized or approved independent school a confidential
employment separation agreement that inhibits the disclosure to prospective
employers and responsible licensing entities of factual information about a
prospective employee’s background that would lead a reasonable person to
conclude that the prospective employee has engaged in conduct jeopardizing
the safety of a minor. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 32 of 84
under 33 V.S.A. chapter 49, a board member, superintendent, or headmaster
and employees of a supervisory union, school district, or recognized or
approved independent school shall provide factually correct information
concerning a former employee’s employment record with the supervisory
union, school district, or recognized or approved independent school to a
prospective employer of that individual if requested by the prospective
employer. Nothing in this subsection shall permit the disclosure of
information that is prohibited from disclosure by subsection (b) of this section.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not be
subject to civil or criminal liability for disclosing information that is required
by this section to be disclosed if the person was acting in good faith. This
immunity from liability shall not apply when the information supplied by a
person is knowingly false or rendered with a malicious purpose.
Sec. 15. 16 V.S.A. § 255 is amended to read:
§ 255. PUBLIC AND INDEPENDENT SCHOOL EMPLOYEES;
CONTRACTORS
(a) Superintendents, headmasters of recognized or approved independent
schools, and their contractors shall request criminal record information for the
following:
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 33 of 84
(j) The board of trustees of a recognized or approved independent school
shall request a criminal record check and a check of the Registries pursuant to
the provisions of this section prior to offering employment to a headmaster.
* * *
Sec. 16. 16 V.S.A. § 256 is amended to read:
§ 256. CONTINUED VALIDITY OF CRIMINAL RECORD CHECK;
MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS
(a)(1) Anyone required to request a criminal record check under this
subchapter about a person who previously has undergone a check, regardless
of whether the check was for student teaching, licensure, or employment
purposes, shall comply with that requirement by acquiring the results of the
previous criminal record check unless:
(A) the person refuses to authorize release of the information;
(B) the record no longer exists;
(C) since the record check, there has been a period of one year or
more during which the person has not worked for a Vermont school district or
a recognized or an approved independent school; or
(D) as otherwise required by this chapter.
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 34 of 84
Sec. 17. 16 V.S.A. § 563a is amended to read:
§ 563a. PREVENTION, IDENTIFICATION, AND REPORTING OF
CHILD SEXUAL ABUSE AND SEXUAL VIOLENCE
Each school board of a school district and governing body of an approved
or a recognized independent school shall ensure that adults employed in the
schools within its jurisdiction receive orientation, information, or instruction
on the prevention, identification, and reporting of child sexual abuse, as
defined in 33 V.S.A. § 4912(8), and sexual violence. This shall include
information regarding the signs and symptoms of sexual abuse, sexual
violence, grooming processes, recognizing the dangers of child sexual abuse in
and close to the home, and other predatory behaviors of sex offenders. The
school board or governing body shall also provide opportunities for parents,
guardians, and other interested persons to receive the same information. The
Agencies of Education and of Human Services shall provide materials and
technical support to any school board or governing body that requests
assistance in implementing this section.
Sec. 18. 16 V.S.A. § 568 is amended to read:
§ 568. SCHOOL BRANDING
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “School” means a public school or an a recognized independent
school approved under section 166 of this title.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 35 of 84
* * *
Sec. 19. 16 V.S.A. § 570 is amended to read:
§ 570. HARASSMENT, HAZING, AND BULLYING PREVENTION
POLICIES
* * *
(e) Definitions. In As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Educational institution” and “school” mean a public school or an
approved or a recognized independent school as defined in section 11 of this
title.
* * *
Sec. 20. 16 V.S.A. § 702 is amended to read:
§ 702. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Member district” means a school district, which can be a union
school district, that is a member of a union elementary school district or a
union high school district for certain grades, prekindergarten through grade 12,
and is a distinct district organized to provide for the education of its resident
students for all other grades, whether by operating one or more schools or
paying tuition to a designated school or schools.
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 36 of 84
(13)(A) “Union school district” means a municipality formed under the
provisions of this chapter that is governed by a single publicly elected board
and that is responsible for the education of students residing in two or more
towns in the grades for which the district is organized by:
(i) operating a school or schools for all grades;
(ii) operating a school or schools for all students in one or more
grades and paying tuition to a designated school or schools for all students in
the remaining grade or grades; or
(iii) paying tuition to a designated school or schools for all grades.
* * *
Sec. 21. 16 V.S.A. § 708(c) is amended to read:
(c) Proposal to form union school district; report and proposed articles of
agreement. If a study committee determines that it is advisable to propose
formation of a union school district, then it shall prepare a report analyzing the
strengths and challenges of the current structures of all “necessary” and
“advisable” school districts and outlining the ways in which a union school
district promotes the State policy set forth in section 701 of this chapter. The
study committee shall also prepare proposed articles of agreement that, if
approved pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall serve as the operating
agreement for the new union school district. At a minimum, articles of
agreement shall state:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 37 of 84
(1) The name of any school district the study committee considers
“necessary” to formation of the proposed union school district.
(2) The name of any school district the study committee considers
“advisable” to include in the proposed union school district.
(3) The legal name or temporary legal name by which the union school
district shall be known.
(4) The grades, if any, that the proposed union school district will
operate and the grades, if any, for which it will pay tuition to a designated
school or schools.
* * *
(12) The date on which the union school district will be solely
responsible for the education of its resident students in the grades for which it
is organized and will begin operating any schools, paying any tuition to a
designated school or schools, and providing educational services.
* * *
Sec. 22. 16 V.S.A. § 722 is amended to read:
§ 722. AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLES OF AGREEMENT
(a) The union school district voters. Only the voters of a union school
district may amend a specific condition or agreement in the district’s articles of
agreement if the condition or agreement was set forth as a distinct subsection
in the warning required by section 712 (warning on vote to establish union
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 38 of 84
school district and elect initial members of the board) of this chapter to form
the union school district or in a subsequent warning to amend the articles
pursuant to this section, which the voters approved.
(b) The union school district board. The board of a union school district
may amend a specific condition or agreement in the district’s articles of
agreement only if the condition or agreement was not set forth as a distinct
subsection in a warning required in subsection (a) of this section, but was
instead incorporated into the warning by reference pursuant subsection 712(e)
of this chapter (warning on vote to establish union school district and elect
initial members of the board), or if the original articles of agreement or voter-
approved amendments authorize the board to amend a specific condition or
agreement.
(c) Reduction of grades operated. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (a) (union school district voters) of this section, the voters shall not
vote whether to reduce the grades that the union school district operates, and to
begin paying tuition to a designated school or school for those grades, unless
the State Board finds it is in the best interests of the State, the students, and the
districts involved and aligns with the policy set forth in section 701 of this title
and gives prior approval to the proposed amendment.
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 39 of 84
Sec. 23. 16 V.S.A. § 724 is amended to read:
§ 724. WITHDRAWAL FROM OR DISSOLUTION OF A UNIFIED
UNION SCHOOL DISTRICT
* * *
(d) Report, including a plan for withdrawal; decision not to prepare report.
(1) Report supporting withdrawal.
(A) If, after conducting the analysis required by subsection (c) of this
section, the withdrawal study committee votes to advance the withdrawal
process as further outlined in this section, then the committee shall prepare a
report, which it shall deliver electronically to the union district board and
which the superintendent shall publish on the district’s website.
(B) At a minimum, the report shall include:
(i) the analysis conducted pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, describing the ways in which the data and analysis:
(I) support withdrawal; and
(II) do not support the continuation of the union district in its
current configuration;
(ii) the proposed financial terms of withdrawal, including the
proposed ownership of buildings and other assets and the proposed
responsibility for financial and other contractual obligations, including debts;
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 40 of 84
(iii) a plan, including a detailed timeline, for the actions the
proposed new school district would take to ensure that, on a proposed
operational date, it could provide for the education of its students in
prekindergarten through grade 12 by operating all grades, tuitioning all grades
to a designated school or schools, or operating some grades and tuitioning the
remainder, to a designated school or schools in a manner that will meet
educational quality standards as required by section 165 of this title, and
including, if applicable, the process by which the proposed new school district
would explore formation of a new union school district with one or more other
school districts in the region and would integrate or condition any votes to
withdraw with votes on formation of a new union district; and
* * *
Sec. 24. 16 V.S.A. § 912 is amended to read:
§ 912. STUDENT’S RIGHT OF REFUSAL; ANIMAL DISSECTION
(a) A student in a public elementary or secondary school or an approved a
recognized independent school shall have the right to be excused from
participating in any lesson, exercise, or assessment requiring the student to
dissect, vivisect, or otherwise harm or destroy an animal or any part of an
animal, or to observe any of these activities, as part of a course of instruction.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 41 of 84
(b) Each school district and approved recognized independent school shall
adopt and implement policies regarding a student’s right to be excused under
this section, which shall include:
* * *
Sec. 25. 16 V.S.A. § 944 is amended to read:
§ 944. DUAL ENROLLMENT PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. There is created a statewide Dual Enrollment
Program to be a potential component of a student’s flexible pathway. The
Program shall include college courses offered on the campus of an accredited
postsecondary institution and college courses offered by an accredited
postsecondary institution on the campus of a secondary school. The Program
may include online college courses or components.
(b) Students.
(1) A Vermont resident who has completed grade 10 but has not
received a high school diploma is eligible to participate in the Program if:
(A) the student:
(i) is enrolled in:
(I) a Vermont public school, including a Vermont career
technical center;
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 42 of 84
(II) a public school in another state or an approved independent
school that is designated as the public secondary school for the student’s
district of residence pursuant to section 827 of this title; or
(III) an approved independent a school in Vermont to which the
student’s district of residence pays publicly funded tuition on behalf of the
student eligible for designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title that is
designated as the public secondary school for the student’s district of residence
pursuant to section 827 of this title;
(ii) is a student in the Adult Diploma Program under subsection
945(a) of this title; or
(iii) is a home study student;
(B) dual enrollment is an element included within the student’s
personalized learning plan; and
(C) the secondary school and the postsecondary institution have
determined that the student is sufficiently prepared to succeed in a dual
enrollment course, which can be determined in part by the assessment tool or
tools identified by the participating postsecondary institution.
* * *
Sec. 26. 16 V.S.A. § 946 is amended to read:
§ 946. EARLY COLLEGE
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 43 of 84
(c) A student on whose behalf the Secretary makes a payment pursuant to
subsection (a) of this subsection section:
(1) shall be enrolled as a full-time student in the institution receiving the
payment for the academic year for which payment is made;
(2) shall not be enrolled concurrently in a secondary school operated by
the student’s district of residence or to which the district pays tuition on the
student’s behalf to a designated school or schools; and
(3) shall not be included in the average daily membership of any school
district for the academic year for which payment is made; provided, however,
that if more than five percent of the grade 12 students residing in a district
enroll in an early college program, then the district may include the number of
students in excess of five percent in its average daily membership; but further
provided that a student in grade 12 enrolled in a college program shall be
included in the percentage calculation only if, for the previous academic year,
the student was enrolled in a school maintained by the district or was a student
for whom the district paid tuition to a public or approved independent
designated school.
* * *
Sec. 27. 16 V.S.A. § 1045(a) is amended to read:
(a) A driver education and training course, approved by the Agency of
Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall be made available to
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 44 of 84
students whose parent or guardian is a resident of Vermont and who have
reached their 15th birthday and who are regularly enrolled in a public or
independent high school approved by the State Board.
Sec. 28. 16 V.S.A. § 1046 is amended to read:
§ 1046. ARRANGEMENT
Subject to the approval of the Secretary, each superintendent shall arrange
for the establishment of a driver education and training course for all public
and approved independent schools located within his or her the
superintendent’s jurisdiction that so request.
* * * Attendance and Discipline * * *
Sec. 29. 16 V.S.A. § 1071(e) is amended to read:
(e) Regional calendar. Before April 1 of each year, the superintendents of
schools and the headmasters of public schools not managed by school boards
in an area a technical education service region shall meet, and by majority
vote, establish a uniform calendar within that area for the following school
year. The calendar shall include student attendance days, periods of vacation,
holidays, and teacher in-service education days and shall comply with
subsection (a) of this section. Unless permitted by the Secretary, no area
served by a regional career technical center shall be divided into two or more
calendar regions.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 45 of 84
Sec. 30. 16 V.S.A. § 1073(b) is amended to read:
(b) Access to school.
* * *
(2) Right to enroll in a public or independent school. Notwithstanding
the provisions of sections 822 and 1075 of this title, a pregnant or parenting
student may enroll in any approved public school in Vermont or an adjacent
state, any approved recognized independent school in Vermont, or any other
educational program approved by the State Board in which any other legal
pupil in Vermont may enroll.
(3) Teen parent education program.
* * *
(B) Nonresidential teen parent education programs.
(i) The pregnant or parenting student’s district of residence or the
approved independent or public designated school to which that district pays
tuition for its students (the enrolling school) shall be responsible for planning,
coordinating, and assessing the enrolled student’s education plan while
attending a teen parent education program and for planning, assessing, and
facilitating the student’s subsequent education plan, including the student’s
transition back to the public or approved independent enrolling school. As
determined by the district of residence or the enrolling school, as appropriate,
the student’s educational plan while attending a teen parent education program
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 46 of 84
shall include learning experiences that are the substantial equivalent of the
learning experiences required by the district of residence or the enrolling
school to obtain a high school diploma.
* * *
Sec. 31. 16 V.S.A. § 1075(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Secretary shall determine the legal residence of all State-placed
students pursuant to the provisions of this section. In all other cases, the
student’s legal residence shall be determined by the school board of the district
in which the student is seeking enrollment or, if the student is seeking payment
of tuition to a designated school, the school board from which the student is
seeking tuition payment. If a student is denied enrollment at any stage, the
student and his or her the student’s parent or guardian shall be notified in
writing, within 24 hours, of the provisions of this section. If the student is not
in attendance as a result of a preliminary decision by school officials and a
decision from the school board will not be available by the end of the second
school day after the request for enrollment is made, the Secretary may issue a
temporary order requiring enrollment. Any interested person or taxpayer who
is dissatisfied with the decision of the school board as to the student’s legal
residence may appeal to the Secretary, who shall determine the student’s legal
residence, and the decision of the Secretary shall be final. Pending appeal
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 47 of 84
under this subsection, the Secretary shall issue a temporary order requiring
enrollment.
Sec. 32. 16 V.S.A. § 1121 is amended to read:
§ 1121. ATTENDANCE BY CHILDREN OF SCHOOL AGE REQUIRED
A person having the control of a child between the ages of six and 16 years
of age shall cause the child to attend a public school, an approved or a
recognized independent school, an approved education program, or a home
study program for the full number of days for which that school is held, unless
the child:
* * *
Sec. 33. 16 V.S.A. § 1127 is amended to read:
§ 1127. NOTICE AND COMPLAINT BY TRUANT OFFICER; PENALTY
(a) The truant officer, upon receiving the notice provided in section 1126 of
this title, shall inquire into the cause of the nonattendance of the child. If he or
she the truant officer finds that the child is absent without cause, the truant
officer shall give written notice to the person having the control of the child
that the child is absent from school without cause and shall also notify that
person to cause the child to attend school regularly thereafter.
(b) When, after receiving notice, a person fails, without legal excuse, to
cause a child to attend school as required by this chapter, he or she the person
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 48 of 84
shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) The truant officer shall enter a complaint to the State’s Attorney of the
county and shall provide a statement of the evidence upon which the complaint
is based. The State’s Attorney shall prosecute the person. In the prosecution,
the complaint, information, or indictment shall be deemed sufficient if it states
that the respondent (naming the respondent) having the control of a child of
school age (naming the child) neglects to send that child to a public school or
an approved or a recognized independent school or a home study program as
required by law.
Sec. 34. 16 V.S.A. § 1161a is amended to read:
§ 1161a. DISCIPLINE
(a) Each public and each approved recognized independent school shall
adopt and implement a comprehensive plan for responding to student
misbehavior. To the extent appropriate, the plan shall promote the positive
development of youths. The plan shall include:
* * *
(c) No person employed by or agent of a public or approved recognized
independent school shall inflict or cause to be inflicted corporal punishment
upon a student attending the school or the institution. However, this section
does not prohibit a person from using reasonable and necessary force:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 49 of 84
* * *
Sec. 35. 16 V.S.A. § 1162 is amended to read:
§ 1162. SUSPENSION OR EXPULSION OF STUDENTS
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, a student
enrolled in a public school, approved recognized independent school, or
prequalified private prekindergarten program who is under eight years of age
shall not be suspended or expelled from the school; provided, however, that the
school may suspend or expel the student if the student poses an imminent
threat of harm or danger to others in the school.
Sec. 36. 16 V.S.A. § 1163 is amended to read:
§ 1163. TRANSFER OF SUSPENSION OR EXPULSION TO OTHER
SCHOOLS
(a) If a student transfers from one Vermont public or recognized
independent school to another, then upon application by the student and after a
review of whether the school can provide the student with appropriate services,
the new school may choose to continue a suspension or expulsion imposed by
the original school.
(b) During a period of suspension or expulsion imposed under section 1162
of this title, a student, or parent or guardian, shall not be subject to the
provisions of subchapter 3 of this chapter regarding compulsory attendance at
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 50 of 84
school, unless the conditions of the suspension or expulsion include
participation in a program in the school or an alternative program outside the
school. Further, nothing in this section shall prohibit a suspended or expelled
student from applying to a different Vermont public or recognized independent
school during the period of suspension or expulsion and attending if accepted.
(c) A school district that provides for the education of a suspended or
expelled student by paying tuition to a public or approved independent
designated school may, at the discretion of the school board, provide for the
education of the student during the period of suspension or expulsion by
paying tuition to another public or approved independent school.
Sec. 37. 16 V.S.A. chapter 27, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. School Food Programs
§ 1261a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Food programs” means provision of food to persons under
programs meeting standards for assistance under the National School Lunch
Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq. and the Child Nutrition Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1771 et
seq., each as amended.
(2) “School board” means the governing body of a school district
responsible for the administration of a public school.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 51 of 84
(3) “Independent school board” means a governing body responsible for
the administration of a nonprofit independent school exempt from U.S. income
taxes. [Repealed.]
(4) “Approved Eligible independent school” means an independent
school physically located in Vermont and approved, recognized by the State
Board of Education under section 166 of this title, and eligible for designation
under section 820 of this title.
* * *
§ 1262a. AWARD OF GRANTS
(a)(1) The Agency may, from funds appropriated for this subsection to the
Agency, award grants to:
(A) supervisory unions for the use of member school boards that
establish and operate food programs;
(B) eligible independent school boards schools that establish and
operate food programs; and
* * *
§ 1264. FOOD PROGRAM
(a)(1)(A) Each school board operating a public school shall cause to
operate within each school in the school district a food program that makes
available a school lunch, as provided in the National School Lunch Act, as
amended, and a school breakfast, as provided in the Child Nutrition Act, as
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 52 of 84
amended, to each attending student who qualifies for those meals under these
acts every school day.
(B) In addition, each school board operating a public school shall
cause to operate within each school in the school district the same school
breakfast and school lunch program made available to students who qualify for
those meals under the Child Nutrition Act and the National School Lunch Act,
each as amended, for each attending student every school day at no charge. An
approved eligible independent school operating a school lunch and school
breakfast program made available to students who qualify for those meals
under the Child Nutrition Act and the National School Lunch Act, each as
amended, shall offer the same to each attending student every school day at no
charge in order to qualify for the universal meals supplement.
(C) In operating its school breakfast and lunch program, a school
district and an approved eligible independent school shall seek to achieve the
highest level of student participation, which may include any or all of the
following:
(i) providing breakfast meals that can be picked up by students;
(ii) making breakfast available to students in classrooms after the
start of the school day; and
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 53 of 84
(iii) for school districts, collaborating with the school’s wellness
community advisory council, as established under subsection 136(e) of this
title, in planning school meals.
(D) A school district and an approved eligible independent school
shall count time spent by students consuming school meals during class as
instructional time.
* * *
§ 1264a. LOCALLY PRODUCED FOODS
* * *
(e) As used in this section, “eligible entity” means:
(1) a supervisory union or supervisory district; or
(2) an approved eligible independent school, as defined by subdivision
1261a(4) of this title, operating a food program, as defined by subdivision
1261a(1) of this title, that also qualifies for the universal meals supplement
pursuant to section 4017 of this title.
Sec. 38. 16 V.S.A. § 4017 is amended to read:
§ 4017. UNIVERSAL MEALS SUPPLEMENT
(a) Definition Definitions. For the purpose of this section,:
(1) “Eligible independent school” has the same meaning as that term has
in subdivision 1261a(4) of this title.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 54 of 84
(2) “universal Universal meals supplement” has the same meaning as
that term has in subdivision 1261a(5) of this title.
* * *
(c) Approved Eligible independent schools.
(1) From State funds appropriated to the Agency from the Education
Fund for the universal meals supplement, the Agency shall provide a universal
meals supplement for the cost of each meal actually provided to each
qualifying student on public tuition when meals are offered to all students at no
charge pursuant to subdivision 1264(a)(1)(B) of this title, provided that:
(A) If the approved eligible independent school participates in the
food programs as a site under a public school school food authority, the public
school school food authority shall be reimbursed only for students attending
the approved eligible independent school on public tuition.
(B) If the approved eligible independent school participates in the
Community Eligibility Provision under 7 C.F.R. § 245.9(f), or is in a year
other than the base year of Provision 2 under 7 C.F.R. § 245.9(b), the school
shall provide the Agency with the number of students attending the school on
public tuition and the total number of students enrolled in the school. The
Agency shall calculate the percentage of students attending the school on
public tuition and multiply that number by the paid student percentage, the
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 55 of 84
results of which shall be the number of meals the school shall be reimbursed
for.
(2) Second breakfasts, as allowed under 7 C.F.R. § 220.9(a), do not
qualify for reimbursement under this subsection.
(3) Students attending an approved eligible independent school on
public tuition shall include a prekindergarten child if the approved eligible
independent school also qualifies as a prequalified private provider and the
child’s school district of residence pays tuition to the school pursuant to
section 829 of this title.
(4) An approved eligible independent school is eligible for the universal
meals supplement only if it operates a food program that makes available a
school lunch, as provided in the National School Lunch Act as amended, and a
school breakfast, as provided in the Child Nutrition Act as amended, to each
attending student who qualifies for those meals under these acts every school
day.
(5) Reimbursement from State funds shall be available only to approved
eligible independent schools that maximize access to federal funds for the cost
of the school breakfast and lunch program by participating in the Community
Eligibility Provision under 7 C.F.R. § 245.9(f), or Provision 2 under 7 C.F.R. §
245.9(b), of these programs, or any other federal provision that in the opinion
of the Agency draws down the most possible federal funding for meals served
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 56 of 84
in that program. At the start of each school year, the Agency of Education may
require that a school food authority requesting the universal meals supplement
begin a new cycle of the relevant federal provision and group sites in a manner
the Agency determines will maximize the drawdown of federal funds.
* * *
Sec. 39. 16 V.S.A. § 1387 is amended to read:
§ 1387. POSSESSION AND SELF-ADMINISTRATION OF EMERGENCY
MEDICATION
(a) Pursuant to the requirements of this section, each public and approved
recognized independent school in the State shall permit students with life-
threatening allergies or with asthma to possess and self-administer emergency
medication at school, on school grounds, at school-sponsored activities, on
school-provided transportation, and during school-related programs.
* * *
(c) In each school year for which possession and self-administration of
emergency medication is requested, the student’s parent or guardian shall
develop, in consultation with the school nurse or the designated health care
staff at an approved a recognized independent school, a plan of action
regarding responding to the student’s life-threatening allergy or allergies or
asthma. The plan of action shall be based upon the written documentation
provided by the student’s physician and shall include the name of each
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 57 of 84
emergency medication, the dosage, and the times and circumstances under
which the medication is to be taken. The written plan shall prominently state
that the medication is solely for the use of the student covered by the plan. The
parties developing the plan of action shall determine both to whom the plan, or
notification of the plan, shall be given and the person or persons responsible
for distribution or notification. The plan may include a requirement that the
student notify a school employee or agent after self-administering emergency
medication. The written plan shall become part of the student’s health records
maintained by the school.
* * *
(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a public school district or an
approved a recognized independent school from adopting school policies and
individual plans of action regarding the possession and self-administration of
emergency medication for medical conditions other than asthma and life-
threatening allergies.
Sec. 40. 16 V.S.A. § 1388 is amended to read:
§ 1388. STOCK SUPPLY AND EMERGENCY ADMINISTRATION OF
EPINEPHRINE
(a) As used in this section:
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 58 of 84
(4) “School” means a public or approved recognized independent school
and extends to school grounds, school-sponsored activities, school-provided
transportation, and school-related programs.
* * *
Sec. 41. 16 V.S.A. § 1431 is amended to read:
§ 1431. CONCUSSIONS AND OTHER HEAD INJURIES
(a) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(5) “School athletic team” means an interscholastic athletic team or club
sponsored by a public or approved recognized independent school for
elementary or secondary students.
* * *
(c) Notice and training. The principal or headmaster of each public and
approved recognized independent school in the State, or a designee, shall
ensure that:
* * *
(e) Action plan.
(1) The principal or headmaster of each public and approved recognized
independent school in the State or a designee shall ensure that each school has
a concussion management action plan that describes the procedures the school
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 59 of 84
shall take when a student athlete suffers a concussion. The action plan shall
include policies on:
* * *
Sec. 42. 16 V.S.A. § 1432 is amended to read:
§ 1432. MENSTRUAL PRODUCTS
(a) By enacting this statute, the General Assembly intends to ensure that all
students attending a public school or an approved independent school eligible
for designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title have access to menstrual
products at no cost and without having to request them.
(b)(1) A school district and an approved independent a school eligible for
designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title shall make menstrual
products available at no cost for each school within the district or under the
jurisdiction of the board of the independent school in:
(A) a majority of gender-neutral bathrooms and bathrooms
designated for female students that are generally used by students who are
eight years of age or older; and
(B) the school nurse’s office.
(2) The school district or independent school eligible for designation
under subdivision 820(3) of this title, in consultation with the school nurse
who provides services to the school, shall determine which of the gender-
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 60 of 84
neutral bathrooms and bathrooms designated for female students to stock with
menstrual products and which brands to use.
(c) School districts and approved independent schools eligible for
designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title shall bear the cost of
supplying menstrual products and may seek grants or partner with a nonprofit
or community-based organization to fulfill this obligation.
Sec. 43. 16 V.S.A. chapter 33 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 33. FIRE AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS DRILLS AND
SAFETY PATROLS
§ 1480. EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLANS
* * *
(b) Each approved and recognized independent school shall adopt and
maintain an all-hazards emergency operations plan consistent with the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
* * *
(d) The template maintained by the Vermont School Safety Center shall
include, at a minimum, hazard-specific provisions for:
* * *
(2) An athletic emergency action plan (AEAP) for all public or approved
and recognized independent schools with an athletic department or organized
athletic program. The AEAP shall detail the steps to be taken in response to a
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 61 of 84
serious or life-threatening injury of a student participating in sports or other
athletic activities. The AEAP established by public and independent schools
pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the athletic emergency
action plans policy established by the Vermont Principals’ Association.
§ 1481. FIRE AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS DRILLS
* * *
(b) Each approved or recognized independent school or other educational
institution, other than a university or college, shall adopt a policy mandating
the school to conduct options-based response drills and fire drills in the fall and
spring of each academic year, consistent with the requirements of subsection
(a) of this section. The head of school shall report completion of the biannual
drills to the Agency of Education in a format approved by the Secretary.
* * *
§ 1482. SAFETY PATROLS
(a) In the exercise of authorized control and supervision over students
attending schools and other educational institutions in this State, both public
and independent, the school board or other directing authority of a school or
institution may organize and supervise school safety patrols and the
appointment, with the permission of parents, of students as members for the
purpose of influencing and encouraging other students to refrain from crossing
public highways at points other than at regular crossings and for the purpose of
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 62 of 84
directing students not to cross highways at times when the presence of traffic
would make crossing unsafe.
(b) The school board or other directing authority shall obtain and keep in
force adequate accident insurance to protect students acting as safety patrols
during the performance of their services.
(c) The Commissioner of Public Safety shall, upon the request of a school
board or other directing authority of any public or independent educational
institution, assign an officer or officers of the State Police to assist the school
authorities to organize and supervise school safety patrols, advise and make
recommendations concerning the elimination of traffic hazards endangering
the safety of students, and otherwise assist in promoting safety education in the
schools of the State. Within the appropriation of the Department of Public
Safety, the Commissioner shall furnish any equipment, material, and supplies
that he or she the Commissioner deems necessary for the proper functioning of
the school safety patrols in public schools. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to authorize or permit any safety patrol member to direct vehicular
traffic.
* * *
§ 1484. ACCESS CONTROL AND VISITOR MANAGEMENT POLICY
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 63 of 84
(b) Each approved and recognized independent school shall adopt a written
access control and visitor management policy consistent with the requirements
in subsection (a) of this section.
§ 1485. BEHAVIORAL THREAT ASSESSMENT TEAMS
* * *
(b) Policy.
* * *
(3) Each school district and each approved or recognized independent
school shall develop, adopt, and ensure implementation of a policy and
procedures for use of behavioral threat assessment teams that is consistent with
and at least as comprehensive as the model policy and procedures developed
by the Secretary. Any school board or independent school that fails to adopt
such a policy shall be presumed to have adopted the most current model policy
published by the Secretary. Any superintendent or independent school that
fails to adopt such procedures shall be presumed to have adopted the most
current model procedures published by the Secretary.
* * *
(d) Training.
(1) Each supervisory union, supervisory district, and approved or
recognized independent school shall ensure behavioral threat assessment team
members receive training at least annually in best practices of conducting
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 64 of 84
behavioral threat assessments, as well as bias training. The annual training
shall include the following topics:
* * *
(e) Data reporting and collection. Annually, each supervisory union,
supervisory district, and approved or recognized independent school shall
report data related to completion of and outcomes of all behavioral threat
assessments and manifestation determination reviews to the Agency in a
format approved by the Secretary. At a minimum, the annual report shall
include:
* * *
Sec. 44. 16 V.S.A. 1541a is amended to read:
§ 1541a. RESPONSIBILITY OF LOCAL BOARDS IN SENDING
DISTRICTS
* * *
(b) A school district that maintains a secondary school shall provide the
names and addresses of enrolled students to the CTE center for its region for
the limited purpose of the CTE center providing information to students and
their parents about CTE center offerings. An approved independent A school
eligible for designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title shall provide to
the CTE center the names and addresses of enrolled secondary students for
whom it receives publicly funded tuition dollars under chapter 21 of this title.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 65 of 84
Sec. 45. 16 V.S.A. § 2944(g) is amended to read:
(g) Any public school or approved independent secondary school eligible
for designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title receiving State education
funds shall allow an enrolled student to choose to participate in the graduation
ceremony and senior year activities of the student’s peers if:
* * *
Sec. 46. 16 V.S.A. § 2962(e) is amended to read:
(e) Under section 2973 of this title, a supervisory union, in its role as the
local education agency, may place a student with an individualized education
program under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
chapter 33, with certain approved independent schools that accept public
tuition. If the approved independent school is entitled to special education cost
reimbursement under that section, it may bill the supervisory union for excess
special education costs incurred by the independent school in providing special
education services to that student beyond those covered by general tuition. If
those costs for that student exceed the extraordinary expenditures threshold as
defined in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the supervisory union shall be
entitled to extraordinary reimbursement under this section for that student as if
it incurred those costs directly. [Repealed.]
Sec. 47. 16 V.S.A. § 2973 is amended to read:
§ 2973. INDEPENDENT THERAPEUTIC SCHOOL TUITION CONTRACT
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 66 of 84
RATES
(a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an approved
independent school that accepts public tuition shall enroll any student with an
individualized education program who requires special education services and
who is placed in the approved independent school as an appropriate placement
and least restrictive environment for the student by the student’s individualized
education program team or by the local education agency (LEA); provided,
however, that this requirement shall not apply to an independent school that
limits enrollment to students who are on an individualized education program
or a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794,
and who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the
school.
(2) In placing a student with an independent school under subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the student’s individualized education program team and the
LEA shall comply with all applicable federal and State requirements.
(3) An approved independent school is not required to demonstrate that it
has the resources to serve every category of special education as defined under
State Board of Education rules in order to be approved or retain its approval to
receive public funding for general tuition.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 67 of 84
(4) The terms “special education services,” “LEA,” and “individualized
education program” or “IEP” as used in this section shall have the same
meanings as defined by State Board rules. [Repealed.]
(b)(1) The Secretary of Education shall establish minimum standards of
services for students receiving special education services in independent
therapeutic schools in Vermont and may advise independent therapeutic
schools as to the need for certain special education services in Vermont.
(2)(A) The Secretary of Education shall set, after consultation with
independent schools in Vermont, and based on the level of services provided
by the schools, the maximum rates to be paid by the Agency and supervisory
unions or school districts for tuition, room, and board for residential placement
of students who require special education services. The amount charged by an
independent school for tuition shall reflect the school’s actual or anticipated
costs of providing special education services to the student and shall not
exceed the maximum rates set by the Secretary, provided that the Secretary
may permit charges in excess of these maximum rates where the Secretary
deems warranted. [Repealed.]
(B)(i) An approved independent school that enrolls a student under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section may bill the responsible LEA for excess
special education costs incurred by the independent school in providing special
education services beyond those covered by general tuition. Reimbursement of
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 68 of 84
these excess special education costs shall be based on the direct-cost rates
approved by the Secretary for services actually provided to the student
consistent with the Agency of Education Technical Manual for special
education cost accounting. The Agency of Education shall publish specific
elements that must be included as part of an independent school’s invoice for
excess special education costs, and these elements shall be included in the
written agreement required under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(ii) In establishing the direct-cost rates for reimbursement under
this subdivision (B), the Secretary shall apply the principle of treating an
approved independent school and a public school with parity in the amount of
federal, State, and local contributions to cover the costs of providing special
education services.
(iii) An approved independent school that enrolls a student under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall provide such documentation to the
Secretary as the Secretary deems necessary in order to ensure that amounts
payable under this subdivision (B) to the school are reasonable in relation to
the special education services provided by the school. The Secretary may
withhold, or direct an LEA to withhold, payment under this subdivision
pending the Secretary’s receipt of required documentation under this
subdivision, or may withhold, or direct an LEA to withhold, an amount
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 69 of 84
determined by the Secretary as not reasonable in relation to the special
education services provided by the school. [Repealed.]
(C)(i) The Secretary shall set, after consultation with independent
therapeutic schools in Vermont, the maximum tuition contract rates to be paid
by the Agency and supervisory unions or school districts to independent
therapeutic schools that limit enrollment to students who are on an IEP or a
plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and
who are enrolled pursuant to a written agreement between the LEA and the
school. The maximum tuition contract rates shall be based on the level of
services provided by the school.
(ii) The tuition contract rates established by the Secretary under
this subdivision (C) shall be no not more than the costs that are reasonably
related to the level of services provided by the school and shall be set forth on
a form prescribed for that purpose by the Secretary of Education. The
Secretary shall determine the relationship between costs and the level of
services by using generally accepted accounting principles, such as those set
forth in the Handbook (II) for Financial Accounting of Vermont School
Systems.
(iii) After the Secretary approves a tuition contract rate for an
independent a therapeutic school under this subdivision (C), the school shall
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 70 of 84
not exceed that tuition contract rate until such time as a new tuition contract
rate is approved by the Secretary.
(c)(1) In order to be approved as an independent school eligible to receive
State funding under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the school shall
demonstrate the ability to serve students with disabilities by:
(A) demonstrating an understanding of special education
requirements, including the:
(i) provision of a free and appropriate public education in
accordance with federal and State law;
(ii) provision of education in the least restrictive environment in
accordance with federal and State law;
(iii) characteristics and educational needs associated with any of
the categories of disability or suspected disability under federal and State law;
and
(iv) procedural safeguards and parental rights, including discipline
procedures, specified in federal and State law;
(B) committing to implementing the IEP of an enrolled student with
special education needs, providing the required services, and appropriately
documenting the services and the student’s progress;
(C) employing or contracting with staff who have the required
licensure to provide special education services;
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 71 of 84
(D) agreeing to communicate with the responsible LEA concerning:
(i) the development of, and any changes to, the IEP;
(ii) services provided under the IEP and recommendations for a
change in the services provided;
(iii) the student’s progress;
(iv) the maintenance of the student’s enrollment in the independent
school; and
(v) the identification of students with suspected disabilities; and
(E) committing to participate in dispute resolution as provided under
federal and State law.
(2) An approved independent school that enrolls a student requiring
special education services who is placed with the school under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section:
(A) shall enter into a written agreement with the LEA committing to
the requirements under subdivision (1) of this subsection (c); and
(B) shall ensure that qualified school personnel attend planning
meetings and IEP meetings for the student. [Repealed.]
(d)(1) If a student is placed with an approved independent school under
subsection (a) of this section and either the LEA and the school each certifies,
or the hearing officer under subdivision (3) of this subsection certifies, to the
Secretary of Education that the school is unable to provide required IEP
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 72 of 84
services due to its inability to retain qualified staff, then the LEA shall make
another placement that satisfies the federal requirements to provide the student
with a free and appropriate public education in the least restrictive
environment.
(2) If the conditions in subdivision (1) of this subsection are satisfied:
(A) the approved independent school shall not be subject to any
disciplinary action or the revocation of its approved status by the State Board
of Education due to its failure to enroll the student; and
(B) no private right of action shall be created on the part of the
student or his or her family members, or any other private party, to:
(i) require the LEA to place the student with the approved
independent school or the school to enroll the student; or
(ii) hold the LEA or the approved independent school responsible
for monetary damages due to the failure of the school to enroll the student or
the necessity for the LEA to make an alternative placement.
(3) If the LEA and approved independent school do not agree on whether
the school is unable to retain qualified staff under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, then the LEA and the school shall jointly contract with a hearing
officer to conduct a hearing with the parties and make a determination, which
shall be final. The cost for the hearing officer shall be split evenly between the
two parties. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 73 of 84
(e) Neither a school district nor any State agency shall pay rates for tuition,
room, and board for students receiving special education in independent
therapeutic schools outside Vermont that are in excess of allowable costs
approved by the authorized body in the state in which the independent
therapeutic school is located, except in exceptional circumstances or for a child
who needs exceptional services, as approved by the Secretary.
(f) The State Board is authorized to enter into interstate compacts with
other states to regulate rates for tuition, room, and board for students receiving
special education in independent therapeutic schools.
Sec. 48. 16 V.S.A. § 3448f is amended to read:
§ 3448f. ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTING;
AUTHORIZATION; STATE AID
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Cost-saving measure” means any facility improvement, repair, or
alteration or any equipment, fixture, or furnishing to be constructed or installed
in any facility that is designed to reduce energy consumption and operating
costs or to increase the operating efficiency of facilities for their appointed
functions, that is cost effective, and that is further defined by State Board rule.
(2) “District” means a district or independent school eligible for
assistance under section 3447 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 74 of 84
Sec. 49. 16 V.S.A. § 3455a is amended to read:
§ 3455a. COMPUTER AIDED COMPUTER-AIDED DESIGN
Whenever a school district or independent school makes final application
for construction aid pursuant to subdivision 3448(a)(5) of this title, the district
or school shall submit to the Secretary copies of site plans and building plans
either in computer-aided design (CAD) format, if used, or, if not, in the form
submitted by the architect or engineer to the school board or board of trustees.
Sec. 50. 16 V.S.A. § 4001 is amended to read:
§ 4001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Average daily membership” of a school district or, if needed in
order to calculate the appropriate homestead tax rate, of the municipality as
defined in 32 V.S.A. § 5401(9), in any year means:
(A) The full-time equivalent enrollment of students, as defined by the
State Board by rule, who are legal residents of the district or municipality
attending a school owned and operated by the district, attending a public
school outside the district under section 822a of this title, or for whom the
district pays tuition to one or more approved independent schools or public
designated schools outside the district during the annual census period. The
census period consists of the 11th day through the 30th day of the school year
in which school is actually in session.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 75 of 84
(B) The full-time equivalent enrollment in the year before the last
census period, of any State-placed students as defined in subdivision 11(a)(28)
of this title. A school district that provides for the education of its students by
paying tuition to an approved independent school or public a designated school
outside the district shall not count a State-placed student for whom it is paying
tuition for purposes of determining average daily membership. A school
district that is receiving the full amount, as defined by the State Board by rule,
of the student’s education costs under subsection 2950(a) of this title shall not
count the student for purposes of determining average daily membership. A
State-placed student who is counted in average daily membership shall be
counted as a student for the purposes of determining weighted student count.
(C) The full-time equivalent enrollment for each prekindergarten
child as follows: If a child is enrolled in 10 or more hours of prekindergarten
education per week or receives 10 or more hours of essential early education
services per week, the child shall be counted as one full-time equivalent pupil.
If a child is enrolled in six or more but fewer than 10 hours of prekindergarten
education per week or if a child receives fewer than 10 hours of essential early
education services per week, the child shall be counted as a percentage of one
full-time equivalent pupil, calculated as one multiplied by the number of hours
per week divided by ten 10. A child enrolled in prekindergarten education for
fewer than six hours per week shall not be included in the district’s average
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 76 of 84
daily membership. There is no limit on the total number of children who may
be enrolled in prekindergarten education or who receive essential early
education services.
* * *
Sec. 51. 16 V.S.A. § 4010(c) is amended to read:
(c) Reporting on weighting categories to the Agency of Education. Each
school district shall annually report to the Agency of Education by a date
established by the Agency the information needed in order for the Agency to
compute the weighting categories under subsection (b) of this section for that
district. In order to fulfill this obligation, a school district that pays public
tuition on behalf of a resident student (sending district) to a public school in
another school district, an approved independent a school eligible for
designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title, or an out-of-state school
(each a receiving school) may request the receiving school to collect this
information on the sending district’s resident student, and if requested, the
receiving school shall provide this information to the sending district in a
timely manner.
Sec. 52. 16 V.S.A. § 4010(c) is amended to read:
(c) Reporting on weighting categories to the Agency of Education. Each
school district shall annually report to the Agency of Education by a date
established by the Agency the information needed in order for the Agency to
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 77 of 84
compute the weighting categories under subsection (b) of this section for that
district. In order to fulfill this obligation, a school district that pays public
tuition on behalf of a resident student (sending district) to a public school in
another school district, an approved independent a school eligible for
designation under subdivision 820(3) of this title, or an out-of-state school
(each a receiving school) may request the receiving school to collect this
information on the sending district’s resident student, and if requested, the
receiving school shall provide this information to the sending district in a
timely manner.
Sec. 53. 16 V.S.A. § 4012 is amended to read:
§ 4012. STATE-PLACED STUDENTS
(a) A district that provides for the education of its students by paying
tuition to an approved independent school or a public a designated school
outside the district shall receive from the Secretary an amount equal to the
calculated net cost per pupil in the receiving school, as defined in section 825
of this title, prorated for the percentage of annual tuition billed for a State-
placed student. If the calculated net cost per pupil in a receiving independent
school or school located outside Vermont designated school is not available,
the Secretary shall pay the tuition charged. A district shall not receive funds
under this section if all the student’s education costs are fully paid under
subsection 2950(a) of this title.
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 78 of 84
* * *
Sec. 54. 18 V.S.A. § 1129 is amended to read:
§ 1129. IMMUNIZATION REGISTRY
* * *
(g) As used in this section, “administrator” means an individual licensed
under 16 V.S.A. chapter 5, the majority of whose employed time in a public
school, school district, or supervisory union is assigned to developing and
managing school curriculum, evaluating and disciplining personnel, or
supervising and managing a school system or school program.
“Administrator” also means an individual employed by an approved or a
recognized independent school, the majority of whose assigned time is devoted
to those duties.
Sec. 55. 18 V.S.A. § 1243 is amended to read:
§ 1243. TESTING OF DRINKING WATER
* * *
(e) Waiver.
* * *
(2) A school district, supervisory union, independent school, or child
care provider that receives a waiver under this subsection shall be eligible for
assistance from the State for the costs of remediation that has been
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 79 of 84
implemented or scheduled as a result of sampling conducted after April 22,
2019.
* * *
Sec. 56. 18 V.S.A. § 1781 is amended to read:
§ 1781. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(10) “School” means:
(A) A public school in Vermont, including a regional career technical
center and a comprehensive high school.
(B) An approved independent school. [Repealed.]
Sec. 57. 23 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. DEFINITIONS
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, and unless the context
otherwise requires in statutes relating to motor vehicles and enforcement of the
law regulating vehicles, as provided in this title and 20 V.S.A. part 5, the
following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(34)(A) “School bus” means any motor vehicle used to transport
children to or from school or in connection with school activities, except:
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 80 of 84
(i) Buses operated by common carriers who incidentally accept
school children as passengers.
(ii) Private motor vehicles used to carry members of the owner’s
household. As used in this section, “private motor vehicle” means a vehicle
neither owned nor leased by a public school or an approved independent
school.
* * *
Sec. 58. 24 V.S.A. § 4947 is amended to read:
§ 4947. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS OFFERED TO ENTITIES
PROVIDING EDUCATIONAL SERVICES
* * *
(e) A health benefit association shall make all health benefit plans that it
offers available to approved or recognized independent schools operating in
Vermont that are eligible for designation under 16 V.S.A. § 820. Participation
shall not create joint and several liability as a result of any act or omission of
any other school, municipality, or association. Schools that participate under
this section shall be provided with copies of the annual audit. The provisions
of 16 V.S.A. § 166 shall apply for purposes of determining whether a school
qualifies as an “approved or recognized independent school.”
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 81 of 84
Sec. 59. 28 V.S.A. § 120 is amended to read:
§ 120. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS EDUCATION PROGRAM;
INDEPENDENT SCHOOL
* * *
(b) Applicability of education provisions. The education program shall be
approved by the State Board of Education as an a recognized independent
school under 16 V.S.A. § 166, and shall be coordinated with adult education,
special education, and career technical education.
* * *
(d) Curriculum. The education program shall offer a minimum course of
study, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 906, and special education programs in
accordance with the program description used for recognized independent
school approval.
* * *
Sec. 60. 33 V.S.A. § 4913 is amended to read:
§ 4913. REPORTING CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT; REMEDIAL
ACTION
(a) A mandated reporter is any:
* * *
(2) individual who is employed by a school district or an approved or a
recognized independent school, or who is contracted and paid by a school
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 82 of 84
district or an approved or a recognized independent school to provide student
services, including any:
(A) school superintendent;
(B) headmaster of an approved or a recognized independent school as
defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11;
* * *
Sec. 61. 33 V.S.A. § 5118 is amended to read:
§ 5118. LIMITED EXCEPTION TO CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORDS
OF JUVENILES MAINTAINED BY THE FAMILY DIVISION OF
THE SUPERIOR COURT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Delinquent act requiring notice” means conduct resulting in a
delinquency adjudication related to a listed crime as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 5301(7).
(2) “Independent school” means an approved or a recognized
independent school under 16 V.S.A. § 166.
* * *
* * * Transition * * *
Sec. 62. TRANSITION
(a) A school district that does not maintain an elementary school or high
school and, as of June 30, 2026, paid tuition to the school of a family’s choice
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 83 of 84
under the provisions of 16 V.S.A. chapter 21 in effect at that time shall vote to
designate three or fewer eligible schools in accordance with this act on or
before July 1, 2029. The district shall begin paying tuition only to designated
schools in accordance with this act beginning with the first school year of
designation or the 2029–2030 school year, whichever comes first.
(b) A student enrolled for the 2025–2026 school year in or who has been
accepted for enrollment for the 2026–2027 school year by an approved
independent school and whose district of residence pays tuition pursuant to the
provisions of 16 V.S.A. chapter 21 in effect on June 30, 2026, shall continue to
be entitled to public tuition until such time as the student graduates from that
school.
(c) Under 16 V.S.A. § 562(7), school district voters may authorize a school
board to purchase buildings or sites for school purposes and to locate and erect
schoolhouses. Before the 2029–2030 school year, a school district may vote to
authorize a school board to purchase buildings or sites from an independent
school that the school district paid tuition to for 60 percent or more of its
students under the provisions of 16 V.S.A. chapter 21 in effect on June 30,
2026, in the 2025–2026 school year, for the purpose of opening a new public
elementary or high school within the district. Any new such public elementary
or high school shall meet all educational quality standards pursuant to 16
VT LEG #385517 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.273
2026 Page 84 of 84
V.S.A. § 165 as well as all other laws and rules applicable to public schools,
including teacher licensing requirements under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51.
Sec. 63. INTERPRETATION
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the technical amendments and
conforming changes in this act shall not supersede substantive changes
contained in other bills enacted by the General Assembly in the current
biennium. To the extent provisions conflict, the substantive changes in other
acts shall take precedence over the technical changes in this act.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 64. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, except that Sec. 12 (16 V.S.A.
§ 165) shall take effect on July 2, 2026, and Sec. 52 (16 V.S.A. § 4010(c))
shall take effect upon the occurrence of the contingencies set forth in 2025
Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70(f).
VT LEG #385517 v.2